District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
22 act may be cited as the “DC Student Loan Authority Establishment Act of 2026”.
23 Sec. 2. Definitions.
24 For the purposes of this act the term:
25 (1) “Authority” means the District of Columbia Student Loan Authority established by
26 section 3.
27 (2) “Board” means the executive board of the Authority.
28 (3) “Discretionary income” means the difference between a participant’s annual adjusted
29 gross income and 150% of the poverty guideline based on family size.
30 (4) “Loan” means money borrowed and evidenced by a loan agreement between the
31 Authority and a borrower, including any terms related to repayment, deferment, or interest.
1

32 (5) “Loan agreement” means a contract between the participant and the Authority which
33 specifies the promises made by each party. The Loan Agreement shall reflect the total amount
34 borrowed by the Participant as well as the terms of Repayment.
35 (6) “Interest rate” means the money paid regularly for the use of money lent or for
36 delaying repayment of the debt. The Interest Rate shall be specified in the Loan Agreement.
37 (7) “Qualifying program” means any regionally accredited post-secondary educational or
38 vocational training program.
39 (8) “Participant” means any person who executes a Loan Agreement with the Authority
40 pursuant to the requirement of the financial assistance.
41 Sec. 3. Authority establishment and purpose.
42 (a)(1) There is established, as an independent authority of the District government, the
43 District of Columbia Student Loan Authority. The Authority shall be a corporate body, created to
44 effectuate the purposes of this act, and with a separate legal existence within the District
45 government.
46 (b) The purpose of the Authority shall be to:
47 (1) Provide new student loans and refinance existing student loans to individuals
48 residing in the District at the time of application and to students of post-secondary educational
49 programs located in the District of Columbia; and
50 (2) Engage in any other activities that may help students attending higher
51 education institutions.
52 Sec. 4. Executive board establishment and membership.
53 (a) There is established an executive board to govern the Authority, which shall consist of
54 5 voting members appointed by the Mayor, with the advice and consent of the Council, pursuant
2

55 to section 2(f) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-141; D.C.
56 Official Code § 1- 523.01(f)), and 2 ex-officio members, all of whom shall be residents of the
57 District.
58 (b) The voting members shall include:
59 (A) A representative of the Consortium of Universities of the Washington
60 Metropolitan Area or a similar organization;
61 (B) A representative from an education-focused advocacy organization in the
62 District of Columbia;
63 (C) A representative from a consumer protection-focused advocacy organization
64 in the District of Columbia; and
65 (D) Two District of Columbia residents with student loans.
66 (c) The 2 ex-officio members shall include:
67 (A) The Chief Financial Officer; and
68 (B) The Student Loan Ombudsman, established by section 7a of the Department
69 of Insurance and Securities Regulation Establishment Act of 1996, effective February 18, 2017
70 (D.C. law 21-214; D.C. Official Code § 31-106.01).
71 (d) Voting members serve 4 year terms; except, that for the initial appointments shall be
72 for a term of 2 years, one shall be for a term of 3 years, and 2 shall be for a term of 4 years.
73 (e)(1) Within 90 days after a vacancy occurs or a term expires, the Mayor shall nominate
74 an individual to fill the vacancy.
75 (2) A member of the executive board may continue to serve until his or her
76 successor has been approved by the Council and appointed by the Mayor.
3

77 (3) Vacancies for an unexpired term shall be filled by Mayoral appointment in the
78 same manner of the original appointment.
79 (f)(1) The Mayor or the board may remove a member of the board for inefficiency,
80 neglect of duty, or misconduct in office, after giving the member a copy of the charges against
81 the member and an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel in their defense upon not less
82 than 10 days’ notice.
83 (2) Removal of a member by action of the board shall require an affirmative vote
84 of a majority of the voting members.
85 (3) If a member is removed by the board, the board shall promptly notify the
86 Mayor and the Council of the action.
87 (g) Members shall be eligible for reappointment.
88 (h) The board shall elect a chairperson every 2 years.
89 (i) The Board shall be subject to the Open Meetings Act, effective March 31, 2011 (D.C.
90 Law 18-350; D.C. Official Code § 2-571 et seq.).
91 Sec. 5. Powers and duties of executive board.
92 (a) The board may enter into memoranda of understanding or information sharing
93 agreements with federal agencies, District agencies, or agencies of other states, to carry out the
94 provisions of this act; provided, that such agreements include adequate protections with respect
95 to the confidentiality of information and comply with all District and federal laws and
96 regulations.
97 (b) The board shall have procurement authority independent of the Office of Contracting
98 and Procurement and shall not be subject to the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010,
4

99 effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-352.01 et seq.) (“PPRA”);
100 except, that section 202 of the PPRA (D.C. Official Code § 2-352.02) shall apply.
101 (c)(1) The board, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
102 Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue
103 rules to implement the provisions of this act.
104 (2) The board shall submit all proposed rules to the Council for a 30-day period of
105 review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council
106 does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution, within this
107 30-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.
108 Sec. 6. Executive director and Authority staff.
109 (a) The board shall hire an executive director within 60 days of a majority of executive
110 board members being confirmed to organize, administer, and manage the operations of the
111 Authority.
112 (b) The executive director shall not be an employee in the career service and shall serve
113 at the pleasure of the executive board.
114 (c) The executive director shall be a District resident or shall become a resident of the
115 District within 180 days of the date of hire.
116 (d) The board shall determine the appropriate compensation for the executive director;
117 provided, that the executive director's compensation shall not exceed the maximum allowable
118 salary in the District’s Excepted Service salary schedule.
119 (e) Under the direction of the board, the executive director shall;
120 (1) Be the chief administrative officer of the Authority;
121 (2) Direct, administer, and manage the operations of the Authority; and
5

122 (3) Perform all duties necessary to comply with and carry out the provisions of
123 this act, consistent with other federal and District laws and regulations.
124 (f) The executive director may employ, retain, and set compensation for staff for the
125 Authority, provided, that employee compensation shall not exceed the maximum allowable
126 salary in the District of Columbia Excepted Service salary schedule.
127 (g) The Board shall exercise personnel authority over the Authority.
128 Sec. 7. Conflicts of interest.
129 (a) No member of the board, other than the member of the board appointed as a
130 representative of the Consortium of Universities of the Washington Metropolitan Area, or staff
131 of the Authority, shall, with regards to an institution of higher education, a financial institution
132 invested in student loans, or a private student loan organization:
133 (1) Be an employee;
134 (2) Be a Director or Officer;
135 (3) Be a representative;
136 (4) Be a consultant or employee of a consultant; or
137 (5) Have any other affiliation that establishes a fiduciary, principal, or agent
138 relationship with the institution of higher education, a financial institution invested in student
139 loans, or a private student loan organization.
140 (b) No member of the executive board may use any of the Authority’s programs for
141 which they have participated in setting the rules or limitations.
142 (c) No member of the executive board shall make, participate in making, or in any way
143 attempt to use his or her board position to influence the making of a decision that the board
6

144 members know, or has reason to know, will have a reasonably foreseeable material financial
145 effect, distinguishable from its effect on the public generally, on:
146 (1) The board member or on a member of the board member's immediate family;
147 (2) Any source of income, other than gifts and loans by a commercial lending
148 institution in the regular course of business on terms available to the public without regard to
149 official status, aggregating $250 or more in value provided to, received by, or promised to the
150 board member within 12 months prior to the time when the decision is made; and
151 (3) Any business entity in which the member is a director, officer, partner, trustee,
152 or employee, or holds any position of management.
153 Sec. 8. Loan programs.
154 (a)(1) The Authority shall provide financial assistance to eligible applicants seeking to
155 enroll in a qualifying program in furtherance of an educational or vocational goal.
156 (2) The financial assistance shall be made in the form of deferred payment loans
157 secured by a loan agreement that is executed by the applicant and the Authority. The amount of
158 the financial assistance shall be limited to the estimated cost of attendance.
159 (3) To be eligible, the applicant shall be:
160 (A) A resident of the District enrolled in a post-secondary educational or
161 vocational program;
162 (B) A student:
163 (i) Who is an individual who claims a student as a dependent, a
164 resident of the District, and
165 (ii) Who is enrolled in a qualifying post-secondary educational or
166 vocational training program, or
7

167 (C) A student who is not a resident of the District but who is enrolled in a
168 qualifying post-secondary educational or vocational program that is based in the District of
169 Columbia.
170 (b)(1) The Authority shall provide financial assistance to eligible applicants seeking to
171 refinance existing debt incurred for the purpose of seeking a post-secondary educational,
172 vocational, advanced, or professional education.
173 (2) The financial assistance shall be made in the form of deferred payment loans
174 secured by a Loan Agreement that is executed by the applicant and the Authority.
175 (3) An applicant shall be eligible for the financial assistance under this subsection
176 if the applicant is:
177 (A) A resident of the District of Columbia; and
178 (B) Provides evidence that the existing debt is the result of previous
179 enrollment in a qualifying program.
180 (c)(1) The Authority shall provide financial assistance to eligible applicants who are the
181 parent or other caretaker of a student who seeks to enroll or is enrolled in a qualifying
182 postsecondary educational or vocational program and who is claimed as a dependent by the
183 applicant for federal income tax purposes.
184 (2) The financial assistance shall be made in the form of deferred payment loans
185 secured by a loan agreement executed by the applicant and the Authority.
186 (3) An applicant shall be eligible for financial assistance under this subsection if
187 the applicant:
188 (A) Is a current resident of the District; and
8

189 (B) Provides documentation demonstrating that the student is claimed as
190 the applicant’s dependent for federal income tax purposes.
191 (d)(1) The Authority shall provide financial assistance to eligible participants seeking to
192 enroll in a postgraduate degree program.
193 (2) The financial assistance shall be made in the form of deferred payment loans
194 secured by a Loan Agreement that is executed by the Participant and the Authority.
195 (3) An applicant shall be eligible for the assistance under this subsection if the
196 applicant is:
197 (A) A resident of the District of Columbia;
198 (B) Enrolled in a qualifying advanced or professional degree program, or
199 (C) A student who is not a resident of the District of Columbia but who is
200 enrolled in a qualifying advanced or professional degree program that originates in the District of
201 Columbia.
202 Sec. 9. Loan terms.
203 Financial assistance provided pursuant to section 8 shall be subject to the following
204 conditions:
205 (1) The Authority shall not charge any applicant or participant origination,
206 application, or other associated fees for applying for or receiving a loan.
207 (2)(A) The first $5,000 of any loan made shall not be subject to interest charges.
208 (B) For any loan amount in excess of $5,000, the Board shall establish an
209 interest rate by rule, provided that the rate shall not exceed a maximum rate established by the
210 Board.
9

211 (C) Beginning October 1 of the first fiscal year following the applicable
212 date of this act, and annually thereafter, the $5,000 amount specified in subparagraph (A) of this
213 paragraph shall be adjusted by the Authority to reflect any increase in the Consumer Price Index
214 for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), or a successor index, as published by the United States
215 Bureau of Labor Statistics.
216 (3)(A) Repayment of a loan shall be deferred, and no interest shall accrue, during
217 any period in which the student for whom the loan was made is enrolled in a qualifying
218 postsecondary educational or vocational program.
219 (B) Repayment shall begin 6 months after the student completes or
220 withdraws from the qualifying program.
221 (C) Repayment shall be made on a scheduled monthly basis for a term not
222 to exceed 360 months.
223 (D) Monthly repayment amounts shall not exceed 10% of the participant’s
224 annual discretionary income, divided by 12, as determined by the Authority by rule.
225 (4)(A) A participant who has entered repayment under a loan agreement may have
226 any outstanding loan balance discharged after completing 10 cumulative years of full-time
227 employment in public service.
228 (B) To qualify as public service employment, the employment shall:
229 (1) Be with any local, state, or federal government entity or non-
230 profit organization;
231 (ii) Be for 10 cumulative years; provided, that the employment
232 may be with more than one qualifying employer, must begin upon completion of or withdrawal
233 from a qualifying program, and do not have to be consecutive; and
10

234 (iii) May include work performed either as an employee or
235 contractor for the qualifying employer.
236 (C) For purposes of this paragraph, the term “full time” means:
237 (i) A minimum average of 30 hours per week during the period
238 being certified;
239 (ii) A minimum of 30 hours per week throughout a contractual or
240 employment period of at least 8 months in a 12-month period, such as elementary and secondary
241 school teachers and professors and instructors, in higher education, in which case the participant
242 is deemed to have worked full time; or
243 (iii) The equivalent of 30 hours per week as determined by
244 multiplying each credit or contact hour taught per week by at least 3.35 in non-tenure track
245 employment at an institution of higher education.
246 (D) Routine paid vacation or paid leave time hours provided by the
247 employer, and leave taken under the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C.
248 2612(a)(1)) shall count towards the hours for determining full time status.
249 Sec. 10. Reports.
250 (1) The Authority shall release an annual report, detailing the Authority’s
251 activities during the year, including:
252 (A) Loans given, broken down by type of loan and length of term;
253 (B) Amount and number of loans in repayment status; and
254 (C) Amount and number of loans forgiven.
255 (2) The Authority shall also issue quarterly financial reports.
256 (3) All reports published by the Authority must be available on its website
11

257 (4) The Authority shall contract at least once each year with an independent
258 certified public accountant to audit the books and accounts of the Authority. The Authority shall
259 transmit the audit to the Mayor and Council within 10 days of receipt.
260 Sec. 11. Outsourcing.
261 (a) The Authority may not contract out the servicing of student loans.
262 (b) The Authority may contract out for supplies, technology, and advice necessary for the
263 servicing of the loans.
264 Sec. 12. Delegation of Council authority to issue revenue bonds, notes and other
265 obligations for Authority undertakings.
266 (a) The Council delegates to the Authority the authority of the Council under section
267 490(a)(6)(A) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat.
268 809; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.90(a)(6)(A)), to issue revenue bonds, notes, and other
269 obligations to borrow money to finance or assist in the financing of undertakings authorized by
270 this act.
271 (b) Bonds, notes, and other obligations issued under the provisions of this act shall not
272 constitute an obligation of the District and are payable solely from the revenues or assets of the
273 Authority. Each bond, note, or other obligation issued under this act shall contain on its face a
274 statement that the Authority is not obligated to pay principal or interest except from the revenues
275 or assets pledged and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the District is
276 pledged to the payment of the principal or interest on a bond, note, or other obligation.
277 (c) Assets and income of the Authority or of any entity established by the Authority shall
278 be exempt from District taxation.
12

279 (d) Bonds and notes issued by the Authority and the interest there on shall be exempt
280 from District taxation except estate, inheritance, and gift taxes.
281 Sec. 13. Conforming amendments.
282 (a) Section 2(6F) of the Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation
283 Establishment Act of 1996, effective May 21, 1997 (D.C. Law 11-268; D.C. Official Code § 31-
284 101(6F), is amended by striking the phrase “loan.” and inserting the phrase “loan, including the
285 District of Columbia Student Loan Authority established by section 3 of the Student Loan
286 Authority Establishment Act of 2026, as introduced on _______ (Bill 26-____).” in its place.
287 (b) Section 28-3901(e) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended to read as
288 follows:
289 “(e)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, this chapter’s application to:
290 “(A) Landlord-tenant relations shall include the District of Columbia
291 Housing Authority's activities as a landlord; and
292 “(B) Consumer credit shall include District of Columbia Student Loan
293 Authority.
294 “(2) This chapter shall not be construed to otherwise apply to the District of
295 Columbia, its agencies or instrumentalities, or any employee thereof acting within the scope of
296 the employee's official duties.
297 Sec. 14. Fiscal impact statement.
298 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
299 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
300 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
301 Sec. 15. Effective date.
13

302 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
303 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
304 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
305 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
14